Maryland, session 2026, HB1622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(n) (1) “Transportation network services” means the activities of an operator
during:
(i) transportation network coverage period one, during which the
operator is logged onto and ready to accept a prearranged ride request made through a
transportation network company’s digital network application;
(ii) transportation network coverage period two, during which the
operator accepts a ride request from a passenger that is prearranged through a
transportation network company’s digital network application, and is traveling to a
predetermined location to pick up the passenger; and
(iii) transportation network coverage period three, during which the
operator transports the passenger and continuing until the passenger departs the motor
vehicle.

HOUSE BILL 1622 3
(2) “Transportation network services” does not include:
(i) providing taxicab services, sedan services, or limousine services;
(ii) any shared expense carpool arrangement or service or other type
of arrangement or service in which a driver receives a fee that does not exceed the driver’s
costs associated with providing a ride; or
(iii) transportation services that a nonprofit organization provides
through the use of a volunteer driver and the volunteer driver’s personal vehicle.
10–404.
(h) (2) The Commission may not disclose records or information provided to
the Commission under this section to any person unless:
(i) the disclosure is required by court order or order of the Maryland
Tax Court; OR
(ii) the disclosure is made in accordance with § 10–119.3 of the
Family Law Article[; or
(iii) the disclosure is to the Comptroller under § 10–406(g)(5) of this
subtitle].
[10–406.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Assessment” means a charge imposed by a local jurisdiction on each
transportation network service that includes a passenger trip during transportation
network coverage period three as described in § 10–101(n)(1)(iii) of this title.
(3) “Exempt jurisdiction” means a county or municipal corporation that
imposed a tax, fee, or charge on for–hire transportation services provided on a per ride or
per passenger basis in that county or municipal corporation on or before January 1, 2015.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this section does
not limit the authority of an exempt jurisdiction to impose an assessment, a tax, a fee, or a
charge on for–hire transportation services, including transportation network services.
(2) An exempt jurisdiction may not impose more than one assessment or
similar charge on a transportation network service.
(c) (1) In accordance with subsections (d) and (e) of this section, a county or
municipal corporation may impose an assessment under this section.

HOUSE BILL 1622
(2) Except in an exempt jurisdiction, an assessment by a county or
municipal corporation authorized by this section may not exceed 25 cents per trip.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subsection (e)(5) of this section, an
assessment may not be imposed on a transportation network service by both a county and
a municipal corporation.
(ii) If both a county and a municipal corporation impose an
assessment on a transportation network service in accordance with subsection (e)(5) of this
section, the sum of the assessments imposed by both jurisdictions may not exceed 25 cents
per trip.
(4) The revenue generated from an assessment authorized under this
section shall be used for transportation purposes.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to a county or municipal corporation that
licensed or regulated taxicab services on or before January 1, 2015, either directly or
through the Commission as provided in § 10–202 of this title.
(2) (i) A county, in accordance with subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
or a municipal corporation may impose an assessment on trips that originate in the county
or municipal corporation.
(ii) A county authorized to impose an assessment under this
subsection:
1. may impose an assessment on trips that originate in any
area of the county; but
2. may not impose an assessment in a municipal corporation
that is authorized to impose an assessment under this subsection.
(3) If a county or municipal corporation authorized to impose an
assessment under this subsection has not authorized an assessment on trips that originate
in the county or municipal corporation by July 1, 2016, the county or municipal corporation
is subject to subsection (e) of this section.
(4) (i) If a county authorized to impose an assessment under this
subsection plans to impose an assessment under this section, the county shall notify the
municipal corporations in the county of the county’s intent to impose an assessment.
(ii) If a municipal corporation authorized to impose an assessment
under this subsection plans to impose an assessment under this section, the municipal
corporation shall notify the county of the municipal corporation’s intent to impose an
assessment.

HOUSE BILL 1622 5
(e) (1) This subsection applies to a county or municipal corporation that:
(i) is not authorized to impose an assessment under subsection (d)
of this section; or
(ii) 1. is authorized to impose an assessment under subsection
(d) of this section; but
2. has not authorized an assessment by July 1, 2016.
(2) In accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection and subsections (f)
and (g) of this section, a county or municipal corporation may impose an assessment on
trips that originate in the county or municipal corporation.
(3) (i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph:
1. a municipal corporation has priority over the county where
the municipal corporation is located to impose an assessment on trips that originate in the
municipal corporation; and
2. the county may not impose an assessment on trips that
originate in the municipal corporation.
(ii) A county has priority over a municipal corporation to impose an
assessment on trips that originate in the municipal corporation, and the municipal
corporation may not impose an assessment on trips that originate in the municipal
corporation, if:
1. the county has authorized an assessment on trips that
originate in the county under subsection (d) of this section by July 1, 2016; and
2. the municipal corporation is not authorized to impose an
assessment on trips that originate in the municipal corporation under subsection (d) of this
section.
(iii) A municipal corporation that is not authorized to impose an
assessment on trips that originate in the municipal corporation under subsection (d) of this
section and that is located in a county that is authorized to impose an assessment on trips
that originate in the county under subsection (d) of this section may impose an assessment
on trips that originate in the municipal corporation under this subsection after July 1, 2016,
if the county has not authorized an assessment on trips that originate in the county by July
1, 2016.
(4) (i) Before a county may impose an assessment on trips that
originate in a municipal corporation under this subsection, the county shall:

HOUSE BILL 1622
1. notify the municipal corporation of the county’s intent to
impose an assessment on transportation network services that originate in the municipal
corporation; and
2. provide the municipal corporation reasonable time to pass
an ordinance authorizing the imposition of an assessment.
(ii) Before a municipal corporation may impose an assessment on
trips that originate in the municipal corporation under this subsection, the municipal
corporation shall:
1. notify the county of the municipal corporation’s intent to
impose an assessment; and
2. if the county imposes an assessment, provide the county
reasonable time to notify the Comptroller before the municipal corporation’s assessment
becomes effective.
(5) (i) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of this subsection and subject to
subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, both a county and a municipal corporation authorized
to impose an assessment under this subsection may impose an assessment on a
transportation network service if the county and the municipal corporation enter into an
agreement:
1. to share revenues; and
2. that specifies the allocation of the revenues.
(ii) A county and a municipal corporation that enter into an
agreement under this paragraph to impose an assessment on a transportation network
service by both jurisdictions shall provide a copy of the agreement to the Comptroller.
(iii) If both a county and a municipal corporation impose an
assessment on a transportation network service under this paragraph, the sum of the
assessments imposed by both jurisdictions may not exceed the amount under subsection
(c)(3)(ii) of this section.
(f) (1) At least 120 days before an assessment is to take effect, a county or
municipal corporation that intends to impose an assessment shall notify the Comptroller:
(i) of the amount of the assessment;
(ii) of the effective date of the assessment; and
(iii) that the notice required under subsection (e)(4) of this section
was provided to the county or municipal corporation.

HOUSE BILL 1622 7
(2) A county or municipal corporation that imposes an assessment shall
notify the Comptroller at least 120 days before any change in an assessment is to take
effect:
(i) of the amount of the new assessment;
(ii) of the effective date of the new assessment; and
(iii) that the notice required under subsection (e)(4) of this section
was provided to the county or municipal corporation.
(g) (1) This subsection governs the collection, remittance, accounting, and use
of revenues from assessments imposed by a county or municipal corporation under this
section.
(2) A transportation network company shall:
(i) collect assessments on behalf of an operator who accepts a
request for a ride made through the transportation network company’s digital network;
(ii) collect any assessment, fee, charge, or tax imposed by an exempt
jurisdiction on a transportation network service; and
(iii) submit to the Comptroller no later than 30 days after the end of
a calendar quarter, or as otherwise specified by the Comptroller in regulations:
1. the assessments and other revenues collected by the
transportation network company on behalf of the transportation network operators;
2. the allocation of the assessments and other revenues
attributable to each county or municipal corporation that has imposed an assessment based
on where the trip originated; and
3. under oath, a certification that it has submitted the correct
amount of assessments and revenues.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, from the
assessments and revenues imposed by counties and municipal corporations, the
Comptroller shall distribute each quarter the amount necessary to administer the
assessments to an administrative cost account.
(ii) The amount distributed to the administrative cost account may
not exceed 5% of the revenue from the assessments and other revenue.
(4) After making the distribution required by paragraph (3) of this
subsection, within 45 days of the end of each calendar quarter, the Comptroller shall
distribute the remaining revenue to:

HOUSE BILL 1622
(i) the county or municipal corporation that is the source of the
revenue; or
(ii) at the discretion of the Comptroller, the county that is the source
of the revenue for the county to distribute to the source of revenue in the county or
municipal corporation.
(5) The Commission shall disclose:
(i) on the request of the Comptroller, records or information that
relate to the collection, remittance, accounting of revenues from assessments, or the
enforcement of the obligations under this section that are:
1. provided to the Commission under this subtitle; or
2. created, issued, or maintained by the Commission in the
course of administering this subtitle; and
(ii) records or information required by court order or order of the
Maryland Tax Court.
(6) (i) 1. The Comptroller may review or inspect each year, at a
transportation network company’s place of business or a mutually agreed location, records
necessary to ensure that the transportation network company has remitted to the
Comptroller the correct revenues and allocations.
2. Nothing in this subparagraph is intended to limit the
period covered by the Comptroller’s review or inspection, which may include more than 1
year.
(ii) Records or information provided to the Comptroller by a
transportation network company under this subsection are not subject to release under the
Maryland Public Information Act.
(iii) The Comptroller may not disclose records or information
provided by a transportation network company unless the disclosure is required by court
order or order of the Maryland Tax Court.
(iv) On notice that a person is seeking records or information under
subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the Comptroller shall promptly notify the
transportation network company before disclosing the information.
(v) The Comptroller may disclose records or information provided by
the Commission or a transportation network company to:
1. the Maryland Tax Court;

HOUSE BILL 1622 9
2. a legal representative of the State, to review the
assessment information about a transportation network company:
A. that applies for review under Title 13 under the Tax –
General Article;
B. that appeals from a determination under Title 13 of the
Tax – General Article; or
C. against which an action to recover an assessment, an
interest, or a penalty is pending or will be initiated under Title 13 of the Tax – General
Article; or
3. any license–issuing authority of the State required by
State law to verify through the Comptroller that:
A. an applicant has paid all undisputed taxes and
unemployment insurance contributions payable to the Comptroller or the Secretary of
Labor; or
B. the applicant has provided for payment in a manner
satisfactory to the unit responsible for collection.
(vi) 1. Records or information disclosed under subparagraph (v)2
or 3 of this paragraph are not subject to release under the Maryland Public Information
Act.
2. A person that receives records or information under
subparagraph (v)2 or 3 of this paragraph may not disclose the records or information unless
the disclosure is required by court order or order of the Maryland Tax Court.
3. On notice that a third party is seeking records or
information under subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, the person that receives
records or information under subparagraph (v)2 or 3 of this paragraph shall promptly notify
the transportation network company before disclosing the information.
(7) (i) Except to the extent of any inconsistency with this section, the
provisions of Title 13 of the Tax – General Article that apply to the sales and use tax shall
govern the administration, collection, enforcement, and appeals of the revenues from
assessments under this section.
(ii) The limitations governing the sales and use tax under § 13–1102
of the Tax – General Article apply to the assessments imposed under this section.

HOUSE BILL 1622
(8) The Comptroller may adopt regulations or other requirements or
procedures to carry out the provisions of this section, including requirements and
procedures regarding the administration, collection, and enforcement of the assessment.
(h) The Comptroller shall enforce this section and § 10–407 of this subtitle.]
10–406.
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY NOT IMPOSE AN ASSESSMENT,
A TAX, A FEE, OR A CHARGE ON TRANSPORTATION NETWORK SERVICES.
[10–407.
(a) There is a Transportation Network Assessment Fund.
(b) The Fund consists of assessment revenues submitted to the Comptroller from
transportation network companies under § 10–406(g) of this subtitle.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to:
(1) receive assessment revenues submitted from transportation network
companies; and
(2) disburse assessment revenues to the appropriate counties and
municipalities in accordance with this subsection.
(d) (1) The Comptroller shall:
(i) deposit in the Fund assessment revenues received from
transportation network companies; and
(ii) disburse trip assessment revenues to the appropriate counties
and municipalities.
(2) The Treasurer is the custodian of the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, and may not be deemed a part of the
General Fund of the State.
(2) No part of the Fund may revert or be credited to:
(i) the General Fund of the State; or
(ii) a special fund of the State.]

HOUSE BILL 1622 11
10–408.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Transportation network company impact fee” means the fee imposed
by the State under this section on each transportation network service that includes a
passenger trip during transportation network coverage period three as described in §
10–101(n)(1)(iii) of this title.
(b) (1) There is a transportation network company impact fee on passenger
trips that originate in the State.
(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the audit, assessment,
liability for payment, refund, penalty, interest, enforcement, collection remedies, appeal,
and administrative provisions [that are applicable to an assessment imposed under §
10–406 of this subtitle] OF TITLE 13 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE THAT APPLY
TO THE SALES AND USE TAX apply to the transportation network company impact fee.
(2) THE LIMITATIONS GOVERNING THE SALES AND USE TAX UNDER §
13–1102 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE APPLY TO THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY IMPACT FEE.
[(h) This section may not be construed to have any effect on an assessment
imposed under § 10–406 of this subtitle.]
(H) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
Article – Transportation
5–408.
(a) In its operation of an airport, airport facility, or air navigation facility owned
or controlled by this State, the Administration, with the approval of the Secretary and
subject to the direction of the Commission, may contract, lease, or otherwise arrange with
any person to:
(1) Provide the person with services furnished by the Administration or its
agents at the airport or facility; or
(2) Grant to the person the privilege of:
(i) Using or improving for commercial purposes any part of the
airport or facility; or
(ii) Supplying services, facilities, goods, commodities, or other things
at the airport or facility.

HOUSE BILL 1622
(b) (1) (I) For the privileges granted, the Administration may establish,
SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, any terms and conditions and
fix any charges, rentals, or fees that:
[(i)] 1. Are reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege
or service;
[(ii)] 2. Are established with due regard to the property and
improvements used and the expenses of operation to this State; and
[(iii)] 3. Do not deprive the public of its rightful, equal, and
uniform use of any part of the airport or facility.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT FIX ANY CHARGES,
RENTALS, OR FEES ON THE PRIVILEGE OF PROVIDING TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, AT THE
AIRPORT OR FACILITY.
(2) The Administration shall monitor the charges, fees, or prices of any
goods or services offered to the public by persons granted the privilege under this section.
Every contract, lease, or other arrangement shall provide that charges, fees, or prices:
(i) May not be increased without the prior approval of the
Administration; and
(ii) Are to be reasonable. In determining reasonableness the
Administration shall consider the charges, fees, or prices for the same goods or services at
comparable airports.
(3) The Administration shall:
(i) Monitor the employment practices under Title 20, Subtitle 6 of
the State Government Article of persons granted privileges under this section; and
(ii) Refer for investigation all alleged violations of § 20–606 of the
State Government Article to the Commission on Civil Rights, the Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission, or any appropriate State or federal administrative body.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “commercial activity” means the sale,
merchandising, marketing, or promotion of any goods or services.
(2) Commercial activity is permitted at an airport operated by the
Administration only when expressly authorized by and in a manner prescribed by the
Administration.

HOUSE BILL 1622 13
5–418.
(a) (1) Any political subdivision that acquires, leases, controls, or sets apart
any property for an airport, airport facility, or air navigation facility may:
[(1)] (I) Establish and operate the airport or facility;
[(2)] (II) Lease or grant to any person, on the terms and conditions it
considers proper, any right or interest in the airport or facility;
[(3)] (III) [Fix] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FIX
any charges, rentals, or fees for the use of the airport or facility and for any right or interest
granted to any person under this section; and
[(4)] (IV) Delegate any of its powers under this section to any suitable
officer or agency of the political subdivision and, for this purpose, create any new agency or
unit.
(2) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY NOT FIX ANY CHARGES, RENTALS,
OR FEES FOR THE USE OF THE AIRPORT OR FACILITY TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(b) The costs and expenses incurred in connection with any act performed under
this section shall be the responsibility of the political subdivision.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 10–408 of Article –
Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–407.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.